Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0478.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 1. The state administrative board may transfer from the department of corrections to the department of military and veterans affairs, without consideration, administrative jurisdiction over a parcel of state-owned land in the township of Green Oak, Livingston County, Michigan, more specifically described as follows: A parcel of land situated in the North 1/2 of Section 31, Town 1 North, Range 6 East, Green Oak Township, Livingston County, Michigan and more particularly described as follows: Beginning at the North 1/4 corner of said Section 31; thence N86Â°47â02âE, along the North line of said Section 31, 964.29 feet; thence S02Â°52â49âE, parallel with the North and South 1/4 line of said Section 31, 2559.23 feet to the East and West 1/4 line of said Section; thence S89Â°09â50âW, along said 1/4 line, 964.89 feet to the Center 1/4 Corner of said Section 31; thence S89Â°28â36âW, along said East and West 1/4 line, 654.12 feet to the centerline of Lemen Road (66â Wide), thence, N05Â°00â56âW, along the centerline of said road, 976.94 feet; thence N89Â°28â36âE 146.65 feet; thence, along a 197.83 foot curve to the left with a radius of 692.25 feet and a chord bearing and distance of N00Â°37â59âW 197.16 feet; thence S89Â°28â36âW 161.76 feet to the centerline of Lemen Road; thence N05Â°00â56âW, along said centerline, 292.01 feet; thence N02Â°18â44âW, along said centerline, 821.20 feet; thence N87Â°25â49âÂ°E 463.20 feet; thence N02Â°55â53âW 209.30 feet to the North line of said Section 31; thence N87Â°27â31âE, along said North line, 237.07 feet to the Point of Beginning. Parcel contains 92.98 acres of land, more or less. SUBJECT TO the right-of-way of M-36 (7 Mile Road) over the Northerly 33 feet thereof and Lemen Road over the Westerly 33 feet thereof. ALSO SUBJECT TO all agreements, covenants, easements, right-of-ways, reservations, and restrictions of record, if any. Sec. 2. The property description in section 1 is approximate and subject to possible adjustment by a professional survey conducted by the department of technology, management, and budget. Sec. 3. The transfer authorized by this act will be permanent and effective when approved by a resolution of the state administrative board and when the department of corrections and the department of military and veterans affairs are notified of that approval in writing by the department of technology, management, and budget. The department of military and veterans affairs shall assume full administrative jurisdiction over and full responsibility for the subject state-owned property after that time. Sec. 4. All enabling documents regarding the transfer of the property described in section 1 must be approved as to legal form by the office of the attorney general. Sec. 5. The department of technology, management, and budget shall coordinate and implement the transfer. However, the department of military and veterans affairs shall reimburse the department of technology, management, and budget for all survey costs or transaction closing costs incurred, such as recording fees. Sec. 6. The property described in this act includes all improvements made on the land and all surplus, salvage, and scrap property or equipment remaining on the property on the date of the jurisdictional transfer. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor